Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-257
Violations; administrative fine.

The commission may administratively fine pursuant to section 75-156 any person who violates the Automatic Dialing-Announcing Devices Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 22;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 21;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-1222;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 119.